Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.080

Sales to be at public auction.

(1) All sales of county property ordered after a public hearing upon the proposal to dispose of the property must be supervised by the county treasurer and may be sold:

(a) At a county or other government agency's public auction, including a public auction sale by electronic media conducted pursuant to RCW 36.16.145;

(b) At a privately operated consignment auction that is open to the public; or

(c) By sealed bid to the highest and best bidder.

(2) All sales of county property must meet or exceed the minimum sale price as directed by the county legislative authority.

[ 2015 c 95 s 5; 1993 c 8 s 1. Prior: 1991 c 363 s 68; 1991 c 245 s 10; 1965 ex.s. c 23 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.34.080; prior: 1945 c 254 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-7; prior: 1891 c 76 s 4, part; RRS s 4010, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 95: See note following RCW 36.16.145.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Public auction sales, where held: RCW 36.16.140.